Maryland, session 2025, SB0204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
6–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and after complying with § 6–305
of this subtitle, in each year after the date of finality and before the following [July] JUNE
1 20, the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of each county
annually shall set the tax rate for the next taxable year on all assessments of property
subject to that county’s property tax.
6–303.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, in each year
after the date of finality and before the following [July] JUNE 1 20, the governing body of
each municipal corporation annually shall set the tax rate for the next taxable year on all
assessments of property subject to municipal corporation property tax.
(2) If not otherwise prohibited by this article, the governing body of a
municipal corporation may set special rates for any class of property that is subject to the
municipal corporation property tax.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
– 1 –

Ch. 230 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –